apertium-lvs.lvs.dix
    <pardef n="siev/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ā</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ām</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ām</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ām</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ās</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="up/e__n">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ei</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ē</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ju</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ēm</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ēm</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ēm</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ēs</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ast/e__n">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ei</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ē</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ēm</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ēm</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ēm</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ēs</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dvēse/le__n">
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lei</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lē</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļu</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lēm</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lēm</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lēm</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lēs</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mēr/ce__n">
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ces</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ces</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cei</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cē</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ces</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ču</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cēm</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cēm</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ces</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cēm</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cēs</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ces</l><r>ce<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sieva"><i>siev</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ofensīva"><i>ofensīv</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="planēta"><i>planēt</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mala"><i>mal</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eļļa"><i>eļļ</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaļa"><i>gaļ</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galva"><i>galv</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cauna"><i>caun</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="problēma"><i>problēm</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pārtika"><i>pārtik</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kultūra"><i>kultūr</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lidosta"><i>lidost</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nauda"><i>naud</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marihuāna"><i>marihuān</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="priekšāda"><i>priekšād</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lūpa"><i>lūp</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="runa"><i>run</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aka"><i>ak</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cena"><i>cen</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="preču cena"><i>preču<b/>cen</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cūka"><i>cūk</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astrofizika"><i>astrofizik</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fizika"><i>fizik</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galaktika"><i>galaktik</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galvaspilsēta"><i>galvaspilsēt</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pilsēta"><i>pilsēt</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bārda"><i>bārd</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="literatūra"><i>literatūr</i><par n="siev/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="upe"><i>up</i><par n="up/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aste"><i>ast</i><par n="ast/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vāvere"><i>vāver</i><par n="ast/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mērce"><i>mēr</i><par n="mēr/ce__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mērce salātiem"><i>mēr</i><par n="mēr/ce__n"/><p><l><b/>salātiem</l><r><g><b/>salātiem</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="tomātu mērce"><i>tomātu<b/>mēr</i><par n="mēr/ce__n"/></e>
    <e lm="salātu mērce"><i>salātu<b/>mēr</i><par n="mēr/ce__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dvēsele"><i>dvēse</i><par n="dvēse/le__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ābele"><i>ābe</i><par n="dvēse/le__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zāle"><i>zā</i><par n="dvēse/le__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vabole"><i>vabo</i><par n="dvēse/le__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vēstule"><i>vēstu</i><par n="dvēse/le__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skābe"><i>skāb</i><par n="up/e__n"/></e>
